zh-CN: 嗅觉家族: 醛香型; 动物香型; 水生香型; 芳香型; 香醋型; 西普香型; 柑橘香型; 泥土香型; 非常规型; 花香型; 馥奇香型; 清新香型; 果香型; 美食香型; 青香型; 草本香型; 皮革香型; 麝香型; 东方香型; 粉香型; 树脂香型; 辛香型; 木香型; 其他
en: Olfactory family: Aldehydic; Animalic; Aquatic; Aromatic; Balsamic; Chypre; Citrus; Earthy; Eccentric; Floral; Fougere; Fresh; Fruity; Gourmand; Green; Herbal; Leather; Musky; Oriental; Powdery; Resinous; Spicy; Woody; Other
ru: Ольфакторное семейство: Альдегидный; Анималистический; Акватический; Ароматический; Бальзамический; Шипровый; Цитрусовый; Земляной; Оригинальный; Цветочный; Фужерный; Свежий; Фруктовый; Гурманский; Зеленый; Травяной; Кожевенный; Мускусный; Восточный; Пудровый; Смолистый; Пряный; Древесный; Другой
zh-TW: 嗅覺家族: 醛香; 動物性; 水性; 芳香; 巴薩米克; 西普調; 柑橘類; 大地調; 中性調; 花卉調; 薰苔調; 清新; 果香調; 美食調; 綠色調; 草本香調; 皮革調; 麝香調; 東方調; 粉調; 樹脂調; 辛辣調; 木質調; 其他
de: Duftfamilie: Aldehyd; Animalisch; Wasser; Aromatisch; Balsamisch; Chypre; Zitrus; Erdig; Ekzentrisch; Blumenmuster; Fougère; Frisch; Fruchtig; Gourmand; Grün; Kräuter; Leder; Musky; Orientalisch; Pulverförmig; Harzig; Würzig; Holz; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Обонятелно семейство: Алдехиден; Животински; Воден; Ароматен; Балсамико; Шипър; Цитрус; Земен; Ексцентричен; Флорален; Фужер; Свеж; Плодов; Гурман; Зелен; Билков; Кожа; Мускус; Ориенталски; Прахообразен; Смолист; Пикантен; Дървесен; Други
ro-RO: Familie olfactivă: Aldehidic; Animalic; Acvatic; Aromatic; Balsamic; Chypre; Citrice; Note de pământ; Excentric; Floral; Fougere; Proaspăt; Fructat; Gourmand; Verde; Plante; Piele; Mosc; Oriental; Pudrat; Rășinos; Picant; Lemnos; Altele
es: Familia olfativa: Aldehídico; Animálico; Acuático; Aromático; Balsámico; Chipre; Cítricos; Terroso; Excéntrico; Floral; Helecho; Fresco; Frutal; Goloso; Verde; De hierbas; Cuero; Almizclado; Oriental; Empolvado; Resinoso; Especiada; Amaderado; Otros
fr: Famille olfactive: Aldehydic; Animal; Aquatique; Aromatique; Balsamique; Chypre; Agrume; Terreux; Excentrique; Floral; Fougère; Frais; Fruité; Gourmand; Vert; Végétal; Cuir; Musqué; Oriental; Poudreux; Résineux; Épicé; Boisé; Autre
hu: Illatcsalád: Aldehides; Animalic; Vízi növény; Aromás; Balzsamos; Chypre; Citrus; Földes; Excentrikus; Virág; Fougere; Friss; Gyümölcs; Gourmand; Zöld; Gyógynövény; Bőr; Pézsmás; Keleties; Púderes; Gyantás; Fűszeres; Erdei; Egyéb
sk-SK: Čuchová rodina: Aldehydický; Zvierací; Vodný; Aromatický; Balsamico; Chyprový; Citrus; Zemitý; Excentrický; Kvetinový; Fougerový; Čerstvý; Ovocná; Gourmand; Zelený; Bylinkový; Koža; Pižmový; Orientálny; Práškový; Živicový; Pikantný; Drevený; Iné
ja: 香りの系統: アルデヒド; 動物的な; アクア; アロマチック; バルサミコ; シプレ; シトラス; 土っぽい; Eccentric; フローラル; フジェール; 生鮮; フルーティー; グルメ; グリーン; ハーブ; レザー; 麝香の; オリエンタル; パウダリー; 樹脂; スパイシー; ウッディ; その他
da: Olfaktorisk-familie: Aldehydisk; Animalsk; Akvatisk; Aromatisk; Balsamisk; Chypre; Citrus; Jordagtig; Excentrisk; Blomster; Fougere; Frisk; Frugtagtig; Gourmand; Grøn; Urter; Læder; Moskusagtig; Orientalsk; Pulveragtig; Harpiksholdig; Krydret; Træagtig; Andet
fi: Hajuperhe: Aldehydinen; Eläimellinen; Merellinen; Aromaattinen; Palsami; Chypre; Sitrus; Maanläheinen; Eksentrinen; Kukkainen; Saniaismainen; Raikas; Hedelmäinen; Gourmand; Vihreä; Yrttimäinen; Nahka; Myski; Itämainen; Puuterinen; Hartsimainen; Mausteinen; Puumainen; Muu
cs: Čichová rodina: Aldehydická; Animální; Vodní; Aromatická; Balzamiková; Chypre; Citrus; Zemitá; Excentrická; Květinová; Fougere; Čerstvá; Ovocná; Gourmand; Zelená; Bylinná; Kůže; Pižmová; Orientální; Prášková; Pryskyřičná; Kořenitá; Dřevitá; Jiné
it: Famiglia olfattiva: Aldeidico; Animale; Acquatico; Aromatico; Balsamico; Chypre; Agrumi; Terroso; Eccentrico; Floreale; Fougère; Fresco; Fruttato; Goloso; Verde; A base di erbe; Pelle; Muschiato; Orientale; Polvere; Resina; Speziato; Legnoso; Altro
sl-SI: Olfaktorna družina: Aldehidno; Živalsko; Vodno; Aromatično; Balzamično; Chypre; Citrus; Zemeljsko; Ekscentrično; Cvetlično; Fougere; Svežo; Sadno; Gurman; Zeleno; Zeliščno; Usnje; Mošusno; Orientalsko; Pudrasto; Smolnato; Pikantno; Lesnato; Drugo
el: Οσφρητική οικογένεια: Αλδεϋδικός; Ζωώδης; Υδάτινος; Αρωματικό; Βαλσαμικό; Σαμπρέ; Εσπεριδοειδές; Γήινος; Εκκεντρικό; Φλοράλ; Φουζέρ; Φρέσκο; Φρουτένιο; Γκουρμάν; Πράσινο; Φυτικό; Δερμάτινο; Μοσχάτο; Ανατολίτικο; Πουδραρισμένο; Ρητινώδες; Πικάντικο; Ξυλώδες; Άλλο
nb: Luktfamilie: Aldehydisk; Animalsk; Akvatisk; Aromatisk; Balsamico; Chypre; Sitrus; Jordaktig; Eksentrisk; Blomstret; Fougere; Fersk; Fruktig; Gourmand; Grønn; Urte; Skinn; Tung og søtaktig; Orientalsk; Pulveraktig; Harpiksholdig; Krydret; Treaktig; Annet
ko: 향의 계열: 알데히드; 동물; 아쿠아; 아로마; 발사믹; 시프르; 시트러스; 어스; 이센트릭; 꽃; 푸게르; 신선; 과일향; 구르망; 녹색; 허브; 가죽; 사향; 오리엔탈; 파우더; 레지너스; 스파이스; 우디; 기타
nl: Olfactorische familie: Aldehydisch; Dierlijk; Aquatisch; Aromatisch; Balsamico; Chypre; Citrus; Aards; Excentriek; Bloemig; Fougère; Fris; Fruitig; Gourmand; Groen; Kruidig; Leer; Muskusachtig; Oosters; Poederachtig; Harsachtig; Pittig; Houtig; Andere
hr-HR: Olfaktorna kategorija: Aldehidni; Životinjski; Vodenasti; Aromatični; Balzamični; Chypre; Citrusni; Zemljani; Ekscentrični; Cvjetni; Fougere; Svježi; Voćni; Gurmanski; Zelena; Biljni; Kožni; Mošusni; Orijentalni; Puderasti; Smolni; Pikantni; Drvenasti; Ostalo
lt-LT: Olfaktorinė šeima: Aldehidratas; Animalic; Vanduo; Aromatinė; Balzamikas; Šipras; Citrusiniai vaisiai; Žemiškas; Ekscentriškas; Gėlės; Fougere; Šviežias; Vaisinis; Gurmaniškas; Žalia; Žolelės; Oda; Muskusas; „Oriental“; Pudra; Derva; Aštrūs; Medienos; Kita
tr: Koku ailesi: Aldehidik; Hayvansal; Akuatik; Aromatik; Balzamik; Şipre; Narenciye; Topraksı; Eksantrik; Çiçeksi; Fujer; Taze; Meyveli; Gurme; Yeşil; Bitkisel; Deri; Misk; Oryantal; Pudramsı; Reçineli; Baharatlı; Odunsu; Diğer
vi: Nhóm hương: Aldehydic; Động vật; Biển; Thơm; Balsamic; Chypre; Cam quýt; Đất; Lệch tâm; Hoa cỏ; Dương xỉ; Tươi mới; Trái cây; Người sành ăn; Màu xanh lá cây; Thảo mộc; Da; Xạ hương; Phương Đông; Bột; Nhựa; Cay; Gỗ; Khác
sv: Olfaktoriska familjen: Aldehyd; Animalisk; Aquatic; Aromatisk; Balsamisk; Skogsdoft; Citrus; Jordnära; Excentrisk; Blommig; Fougère; Fräsch; Fruktig; Gourmand; Grön; Ört; Läder; Musk; Orientalisk; Pudrig; Resin; Kryddig; Tränot; Övrigt
pt-PT: Família olfativa: Aldeídico; Animálico; Aquático; Aromático; Balsâmico; Chipre; Citrinos; Terroso; Excêntrico; Floral; Fougère; Fresco; Frutado; Gourmand; Verde; Herbal; Pele; Almiscarado; Oriental; Em pó; Resinoso; Picante; Amadeirado; Outro
pt-BR: Família olfativa: Aldeídico; Animal; Aquático; Aromático; Balsâmico; Chipre; Cítrico; Terroso; Excêntrico; Floral; Fougère; Fresco; Frutado; Gourmand; Verde; Ervas; Couro; Almiscarado; Oriental; Atalcado; Resinoso; Condimentado; Amadeirado; Outro
pl: Rodzina zapachowa: Aldehydowy; Animalny; Wodny; Aromatyczny; Balsamiczny; Szyprowy; Cytrusowy; Ziemny; Ekscentryczny; Kwiatowy; Fougere; Świeży; Owocowy; Gourmand; Zielony; Ziołowy; Skórzany; Piżmowy; Orientalny; Pudrowy; Żywiczny; Pikantny; Drzewny; Inne
th: ตระกูลกลิ่น: อัลดีไฮด์; สัตว์; น้ำ; กลิ่นหอม; บัลซามิก; ชิเพร; ซิตรัส; ดิน; ประหลาด; ลายดอก; ฟูแฌร์; สด; ผลไม้; นักชิม; สีเขียว; สมุนไพร; หนัง; มัสกี้; โอเรียนทอล; ผง; เรซิน; กลิ่น Spicy; ไม้; อื่นๆ